Nebraska, session 109, LB973.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB973 LB973
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 81-1108.15, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-1108.15 (1) Except as provided in the Nebraska State Capitol
Preservation and Restoration Act, the division shall have the primary
functions and responsibilities of statewide facilities planning,
facilities construction, and facilities administration and shall adopt
and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section.
(2) Facilities planning shall include the following responsibilities
and duties:
(a) To maintain utilization records of all state-owned, state-
occupied, and vacant facilities;
(b) To coordinate comprehensive capital facilities planning;
(c) To define and review program statements based on space
utilization standards;
(d) To prepare or review planning and construction documents;
(e) To develop and maintain time-cost schedules for capital
construction projects;
(f) To assist the Governor and the Legislative Fiscal Analyst in the
preparation of the capital construction budget recommendations;
(g) To maintain a complete inventory of all state-owned, state-
occupied, and vacant sites and structures and to review the proposals for
naming such sites and structures;
(h) To determine space needs of all state agencies and establish
space-allocation standards;
(i) To cause a state comprehensive capital facilities plan to be
developed; and
(j) To carry out the State Building Construction Alternatives Act.
(3) Facilities construction shall include the following powers and
duties:
(a) To maintain close contact with and conduct inspections of each
project so as to assure execution of time-cost schedules and efficient
-2-

LB973 LB973
2026 2026
contract performance if such project's total design and construction cost
is equal to or greater than the project cost set by subdivision (1)(a) of
section 81-1108.43 as adjusted by subsection (2) of section 81-1108.43;
(b) To perform final acceptance inspections and evaluations; and
(c) To coordinate all change or modification orders and progress
payment orders.
(4) Facilities administration shall include the following powers and
duties:
(a) To serve as state leasing administrator or agent for all
facilities to be leased for use by the state and for all state-owned
facilities to be rented to state agencies or other parties subject to
section 81-1108.22. The division shall remit the proceeds from any
rentals of state-owned facilities to the State Treasurer for credit to
the State Building Revolving Fund and the State Building Renewal
Assessment Fund;
(b) To provide all maintenance, repairs, custodial duties, security,
and administration for all buildings and grounds owned or leased by the
State of Nebraska except as provided in subsections (5) and (6) of this
section;
(c) To be responsible for adequate parking and the designation of
parking stalls or spaces, including access aisles, in offstreet parking
facilities for the exclusive use of handicapped or disabled or
temporarily handicapped or disabled persons pursuant to section 18-1737;
(d) Beginning July 1, 2028, to be responsible for adequate offstreet
parking for all state employees at all sites and facilities owned or
leased by the State of Nebraska without cost to such employees;
(e) (d) To ensure that all state-owned, state-occupied, and vacant
facilities are maintained or utilized to their maximum capacity or to
dispose of such facilities through lease, sale, or demolition;
(f) (e) To submit electronically a report regarding the amount of
property leased by the state and the availability of state-owned property
-3-

LB973 LB973
2026 2026
for the needs of state agencies, upon request by the Appropriations
Committee of the Legislature, the Committee on Building Maintenance, or a
member of the Legislature;
(g) (f) To administer the State Emergency Capital Construction
Contingency Fund;
(h) (g) To submit status reports to the Governor and the Legislative
Fiscal Analyst after each quarter of a construction project is completed
detailing change orders and expenditures to date. The report submitted to
the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall be submitted electronically. Such
reports shall be required on all projects costing an amount equal to or
greater than the amount set forth in subdivision (1)(a) of section
81-1108.43 as adjusted by subsection (2) of section 81-1108.43 and on
such other projects as may be designated by the division; and
(i) (h) To submit a final report on each project to the Governor and
the Legislative Fiscal Analyst. The report submitted to the Legislative
Fiscal Analyst shall be submitted electronically. Such report shall
include, but not be limited to, a comparison of final costs and
appropriations made for the project, change orders, and modifications and
whether the construction complied with the related approved program
statement. Such reports shall be required on all projects costing an
amount equal to or greater than the amount set forth in subdivision (1)
(a) of section 81-1108.43 as adjusted by subsection (2) of section
81-1108.43 and on such other projects as may be designated by the
division.
(5) Subdivisions (4)(b), (c), and (e) (d) of this section shall not
apply to (a) state-owned facilities to be rented to state agencies or
other parties by the University of Nebraska, the Nebraska state colleges,
the Department of Transportation, and the Board of Educational Lands and
Funds, (b) buildings and grounds owned or leased for use by the
University of Nebraska, the Nebraska state colleges, and the Board of
Educational Lands and Funds, (c) buildings and grounds owned, leased, or
-4-

LB973 LB973
2026 2026
operated by the Department of Correctional Services, (d) facilities to be
leased for nonoffice use by the Department of Transportation, (e)
buildings or grounds owned or leased by the Game and Parks Commission if
the application of such subdivisions to the buildings or grounds would
result in ineligibility for or repayment of federal funding, (f)
buildings or grounds of the state park system, state recreation areas,
state historical parks, state wildlife management areas, or state
recreational trails, or (g) other buildings or grounds owned or leased by
the State of Nebraska which are specifically exempted by the division
because the application of such subdivisions would result in the
ineligibility for federal funding or would result in hardship on an
agency, board, or commission due to other exceptional or unusual
circumstances, except that nothing in this subdivision shall prohibit the
assessment of building rental depreciation charges to tenants of
facilities owned by the state and under the direct control and
maintenance of the division.
(6) Security for all buildings and grounds owned or leased by the
State of Nebraska in Lincoln, Nebraska, except the buildings and grounds
described in subsection (5) of this section, shall be the responsibility
of the Nebraska State Patrol. The Nebraska State Patrol shall consult
with the Governor, the Chief Justice, the Executive Board of the
Legislative Council, and the State Capitol Administrator regarding
security policy within the State Capitol and capitol grounds.
(7) Each member of the Legislature shall receive an electronic copy
of the reports required by subdivisions (4)(h) and (i) (4)(g) and (h) of
this section by making a request for them to the State Building
Administrator. The information on such reports shall be submitted to the
division by the agency responsible for the project.
Sec. 2. Section 81-1108.17, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1108.17 (1) The Department of Administrative Services shall be
-5-

LB973 LB973
2026 2026
the custodian of the state laboratory and laboratory grounds, the
Governor's Mansion and grounds, and all other buildings and lands owned
or leased by the State of Nebraska except as exempted under subsections
(5) and (6) of section 81-1108.15 or as provided in the Nebraska State
Capitol Preservation and Restoration Act.
(2) To aid in the performance of his or her duties, the Director of
Administrative Services shall appoint an administrator. The
administrator, under the direction of the director, shall have complete
control and all powers necessary to properly maintain the state
laboratory and laboratory grounds, the Governor's Mansion and grounds,
and all other buildings and lands owned or leased by the State of
Nebraska except as exempted under subsections (5) and (6) of section
81-1108.15 or as provided in the Nebraska State Capitol Preservation and
Restoration Act.
(3) Except as provided in the act, the administrator, under the
direction of the director, is authorized to (a) lease space or provide
facilities for the parking of state officers' and employees' vehicles as
well as bureau fleet vehicles as defined in section 81-1011, (b) lease,
rent, or permit for use as apartments, dwellings, offices, and parking
areas any or all of the property acquired for parking or for future
building needs, (c) lease state property to the federal government or
political subdivisions of the state using the system of charges in
subsection (4) of this section, and (d) lease state property to a private
entity to provide services necessary for state operations or for the
convenience of state officers and employees when the space is not needed
for public use. All leases shall contain the provision that upon notice
that such property is needed for public use, the use or occupancy of the
property shall cease. All money received as rent from any property
acquired shall be remitted to the State Treasurer and credited to the
State Building Revolving Fund, except that receipts from parking charges
for employee, public, and state vehicle parking shall be credited to the
-6-

LB973 LB973
2026 2026
Capitol Buildings Parking Revolving Fund, which fund is hereby created,
for the purposes of providing and maintaining parking for state employees
and visitors.
(4) The system of charges for state buildings and facilities shall
include an amount sufficient to (a) accurately reflect operating costs,
including routine maintenance and repair costs, and (b) fund building
renewal projects under the Deferred Building Renewal Act and renovation,
remodeling, and repair projects beyond the scope of the act, and (c)
beginning July 1, 2028, fund adequate offstreet parking for all state
employees as required by subdivision (4)(d) of section 81-1108.15. The
proceeds received under subdivision (a) of this subsection shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the State Building
Revolving Fund. The proceeds received under subdivision (b) of this
subsection shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the
State Building Renewal Assessment Fund. The administrator shall develop a
system of equitable billings and charges for parking facilities under his
or her control and used by visitors state employees and state vehicles.
The system of charges shall include an amount sufficient to cover the
construction, operating, maintenance, and repair costs associated with
the parking facilities. The administrator, under policies and procedures
established by the Director of Administrative Services, may expend funds
from time to time credited to the Capitol Buildings Parking Revolving
Fund for the purposes of constructing, obtaining, operating, and
maintaining parking facilities for state vehicles, state employees, and
visitors. All money derived from any source other than that to be
credited to the State Building Revolving Fund, the Capitol Buildings
Parking Revolving Fund, the Department of Administrative Services Cash
Fund, the State Building Renewal Assessment Fund, or other appropriate
revolving fund shall be remitted to the State Treasurer and credited to
the General Fund.
(5) The administrator shall see that all parts and apartments of the
-7-

LB973 LB973
2026 2026
buildings leased are properly ventilated and kept clean and in order.
(6) The administrator shall at all times have charge of and
supervision over the police, janitors, and other employees in and about
the state laboratory and laboratory grounds, the Governor's Mansion and
grounds, and all other buildings and lands owned or leased by the State
of Nebraska except as exempted under subsections (5) and (6) of section
81-1108.15 or as provided in the Nebraska State Capitol Preservation and
Restoration Act. The administrator shall institute, in the name of the
state and with the advice of the Attorney General, civil and criminal
proceedings against any person for injury or threatened injury to any
public property in the state laboratory and laboratory grounds, the
Governor's Mansion and grounds, and all other buildings and lands owned
or leased by the State of Nebraska under his or her control, or for
committing or threatening to commit a nuisance in or on the buildings or
lands.
(7) The administrator shall keep in his or her office a complete
record containing all plans and surveys of the state laboratory and
grounds, the Governor's Mansion and grounds, and all other buildings and
lands owned or leased by the State of Nebraska and of underground
construction under such buildings and lands. This subsection shall not
apply to the State Capitol and capitol grounds.
Sec. 3. Original section 81-1108.17, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 81-1108.15, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are
repealed.
-8-